Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB556.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111.4 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6111.4. Registration of firearms.(a) Prohibitions.--(1) Notwithstanding any section of this chapter to the contrary, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow any government, local government, other political subdivision or law enforcement agency or any official, agent or employee thereof to create, maintain or operate any registry of firearm ownership within this Commonwealth. For the purposes of this section only, the term "firearm" shall include any weapon that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the 12345678910111213141516171819 frame or receiver of any such weapon.(2) A payment settlement entity, merchant acquiring entity or third party settlement organization as those terms are defined in 26 U.S.C. § 6050W (relating to returns relating to payments made in settlement of payment card and third party network transactions) may not assign a merchant category code to or otherwise classify a merchant that is a seller of firearms or ammunition separately from general merchandise retailers or sporting goods retailers.(3) An entity involved in facilitating or processing a payment card transaction, including a financial institution, an acquirer, a payment card network or a payment card issuer, may not assign to or require a merchant to use a merchant category code that classifies the merchant as a firearms or ammunition retailer or places the merchant in a similar classification. A merchant of firearms or ammunition may be assigned or may use a merchant category code for general merchandise retailers or sporting goods retailers. Any agreement or contractual provision to the contrary is void in violation of the public policy of this State.(b) Penalties.--(1) A person or entity that violates subsection (a)(1) commits a felony of the third degree. The Attorney General or district attorney of the county where the alleged violation occurred shall investigate complaints of a violation of subsection (a)(1) and shall prosecute violators if evidence indicates that a violation may have occurred.(2) The Department of Banking and Securities shall investigate alleged violations of subsection (a)(2) and (3) and, upon finding a violation, bring an administrative action 20250SB0556PN0598 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 seeking to impose an administrative fine of no more than $2,500 for each violation.(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "firearm" means any weapon that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of the weapon.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0556PN0598 - 3 - 1234567